Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 6. Partition.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partition, § 1 et seq.

68 C.J.S., Partition, § 1 et seq.

Burden of proof as regards alleged prior voluntary partition of property, 1 ALR2d 473.

Estoppel of or waiver by parties or participants regarding irregularities or defects in partition sale, 2 ALR2d 166.

Rights of surviving spouse and children in proceeds of partition sale of homestead in decedent’s estate, 6 ALR2d 515.

Pleading in partition action to authorize incidental relief, 11 ALR2d 1449.

Timber rights as subject to partition, 21 ALR2d 618.

Partition as affected by lease given by part only of cotenants, 49 ALR2d 823.

Compensation, in partition proceedings, for improvements made or placed on premises of another by mistake, 57 ALR2d 281.

Maintainability of partition action where United States or state owns an undivided interest in property, 59 ALR2d 937.

Rights and remedies of one purchasing at partition sale where there was misrepresentation or mistake as to acreage or location of boundaries of trade sold, 69 ALR2d 254.

Contractual provisions as affecting right to judicial partition, 37 ALR3d 962.

Right to partition of overriding royalty interest in oil and gas leasehold, 58 ALR3d 1052.

Lack of final settlement of intestate’s estate as affecting heir’s right to partition of realty, 92 ALR3d 473.

Sec. 09.45.260.
Right of action for partition or sale.

When several persons own real property as tenants in common, in which one or more of them have an estate of inheritance or for life or years, or when real property is subject to a life estate with remainder over, an action may be brought by one or more of those persons or by the life tenant for a portion of it according to the respective rights of the interested persons, and for a sale of the property or a part of it if it appears that a partition cannot be had without great prejudice to the parties.

History.

(§ 22.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.270.
Lien on undivided interest.

Where a lien is on an undivided interest or estate of any of the parties and a partition is made, the lien is then only upon the share assigned to that party, but the share shall first be charged with its just proportion of the costs of the partition, in preference to the lien.

History.

(§ 22.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.280.
Determination of rights of parties.

The rights of the several parties may be determined in the action. If a party having a share or interest in or lien upon the property is unknown, or any of the known parties reside out of the state or cannot be found in the state, the summons may be served upon the absent or known party by publication as in other actions.
Where a sale of the property is necessary, the title shall be ascertained by proof to the satisfaction of the court before the sale may be ordered.

History.

(§ 22.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.290.
Order for partition or sale.

If it appears that the property or a part of it is so situated that partition cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners, the court may order a sale of the property. Otherwise, upon the requisite proofs being made, the court shall order a partition according to the respective rights of the parties as ascertained by it, may appoint one or more referees to partition the property, and shall designate the portion to remain undivided for the owners whose interests remain unknown or are not ascertained.

History.

(§ 22.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For order of sale, see also AS

09.45.330

; for court rule on appointment of masters, see Civ.
R. 53.

Sec. 09.45.300.
Report of referees.

In making the partition the referees shall divide the property and allot its several portions to the respective parties, quality and quantity relatively considered, according to the respective rights of the parties as determined by the court, and designating the several portions by proper landmarks.
The referees may employ a surveyor with the necessary assistants to aid them.

History.

(§ 22.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.310.
Effect of judgment.

Upon hearing and confirmation of the report, the court shall give judgment that the partition be effectual forever, which judgment is binding and conclusive on

all parties named as parties to the action, and their legal representatives, who have at the time an interest in the property divided or a part of it as owners in fee or as tenants for life or for years or as entitled to the reversion, remainder, or inheritance of the property or a part of it, after the termination of a particular estate, and who by any contingency may be entitled to a beneficial interest in the property or who have an interest in an undivided share of it as tenants for years or for life;

persons interested in the property, who may be unknown, to whom notice was given of the action for partition by publication;

other persons claiming from the parties or persons or either of them.

History.

(§ 22.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.320.
Tenant not affected by judgment.

The judgment and partition may not affect tenants for years or for life of the whole of the property that is the subject of partition, and may not preclude any person except those specified in AS

09.45.310

from claiming title to the property in question or from contraverting the title of the parties between whom the partition was made.

History.

(§ 22.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.330.
Order of sale.

If it appears by evidence to the satisfaction of the court that a partition cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners, it shall order a sale of the property.

History.

(§ 22.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For similar provisions, see AS

09.45.290

.

Sec. 09.45.340.
Estate of life or years.

When a part of the property only is ordered to be sold, if there is an estate for life or years in an undivided share of the property, the estate may be set off in a part of the property not ordered to be sold.

History.

(§ 22.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.350.
Reference to determine liens.

If it appears that there are outstanding liens upon the property or a part of it and the persons holding the liens were not made parties to the action, the court may appoint a referee to ascertain whether or not those liens have been paid, and, if not paid, what amount remains due, and their order among the liens severally held by those persons and the parties to the action.

History.

(§ 22.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For court rule on appointment of masters, see Civ.
R. 53.

Sec. 09.45.360.
Appearance of lienholders before referee.

Persons having outstanding liens shall be notified to appear before the referee at a specified time and place to prove the amount due or to become due, contingently or absolutely.

History.

(§ 22.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.370.
Effect of confirmation of report.

If the report of the referee is confirmed by the court, the order of confirmation is binding and conclusive on the parties to the action and upon the lien creditors who have been duly served with notice to appear before the referee.

History.

(§ 22.12 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.380.
Application of proceeds from sale of encumbered property.

The proceeds of the sale of the encumbered property shall be applied under the direction of the court as follows:

to pay its just proportion of the general cost of the action;

to pay the costs of the reference;

to satisfy the several liens in their order of priority by payment of the sums due and to become due;

the residue among the owners of the property sold according to their respective shares, as found by the court.

History.

(§ 22.13 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.390.
Lienholder having other securities.

When a party to an action or a person who holds a lien upon the property or a part of it has other securities for the payment of the amount of the lien, the court may order the securities to be exhausted before a distribution of the proceeds of sale, or may order a just deduction to be made from the amount of the lien on the property on that account.

History.

(§ 22.14 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.400.
Distribution of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of sale and the securities taken by the referees, or a part of the proceeds shall be distributed to the persons entitled to them whenever the court directs.
But if no direction is given, all the proceeds and securities shall be paid into court.

History.

(§ 22.15 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Rights of surviving spouse and children in proceeds of partition sale of homestead in decedent’s estate, 6 ALR2d 515.

Homestead right of cotenant as affecting partition, 83 ALR6th 605.

Sec. 09.45.410.
Continuation of action to determine claims to proceeds.

When the proceeds of the sale of a share or parcel belonging to persons who are parties to the action are paid into court, the action may be continued as between the parties for the determination of their respective claims to the proceeds, which shall be ascertained and adjudged by the court.
Further testimony may be taken in court or by a referee at the discretion of the court, and the court may, if necessary, require the parties to present the facts or law in controversy by pleadings as in an original action.

History.

(§ 22.16 ch. 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.420.
Sale procedure.

All sales of real property made by the referee shall be made at public auction to the highest bidder in the manner required for the sale of real property on execution.
The notice must state the time, place, and terms of sale, and, if the property or a part of it is to be sold subject to a prior estate, charge, or lien, that shall be stated in the notice.

History.

(§ 22.17 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Trust arising from parole agreement to bid in property sold at partition sale for person having an interest therein, 27 ALR2d 1285.

Sec. 09.45.430.
Credit terms.

In the order of sale, the court shall direct the terms of credit that may be allowed for the purchase money of a portion of the premises of which it may direct a sale on credit, and for that portion of which the purchase money is required, by the provisions contained in AS

09.45.260

—

09.45.620

, to be invested for the benefit of unknown owners, infants, and parties out of the state.

History.

(§ 22.18 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.440.
Credit security.

Separate mortgages and other securities may be taken for the whole or convenient portions of the purchase money of those parts of the property directed by the court to be sold on credit in the name of any known owner of full age, otherwise competent, or in the name of the clerk of the court as the court directs.

History.

(§ 22.19 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.450.
Disposal of estate for life or years.

When the estate of a tenant for life or years in a undivided part of the property in question is admitted by the parties or ascertained by the court to be existing at the time of the order of sale, and the person entitled to that estate is a party to the action, the estate may be first set off out of a part of the property and a sale made of that part, subject to the estate of that tenant in that part.
But, if in the judgment of the court a due regard to the interest of all the parties requires the sale of that estate also, the sale may be ordered.

History.

(§ 22.20 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.460.
Compensation for sale of estate for life or years.

A person entitled to an estate for life or years in an undivided part of the property, whose estate has been sold, is entitled to receive a sum as reasonable satisfaction for the estate, the sum being based on principles of law applicable to annuities.
The person so entitled shall consent to accept the sum for the person’s estate by an instrument duly acknowledged or proved in the same manner as deeds for the purpose of record and filed with the clerk of court.

History.

(§ 22.21 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.470.
Determination of value of estate for life or years sold without consent.

If the consent is not given under AS

09.45.460

, before the report of sale, the court shall determine what proportion of the proceeds of the sale, after deducting expenses, is a just and reasonable sum to be invested for the benefit of the person entitled to the estate for life or years, and shall order the sum to be deposited in court for investment.

History.

(§ 22.22 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.480.
Rules for determining value.

The proportion of the proceeds of the sale to be invested under AS

09.45.470

shall be determined as follows: if an estate for life or years be included in the order of sale, its proportion shall be the whole proceeds of the sale of the property, or of the sale of the undivided share in which that estate may be.

In all cases, the proportion of the expenses of the proceeding shall be deducted from the proceeds of the sale.

History.

(§ 22.23 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1984)

Sec. 09.45.490.
Protection of unknown tenants.

If the persons entitled to the estate for life or years are unknown, the court shall provide for the protection of their rights in a similar manner, as far as possible, as if they were known and had appeared.

History.

(§ 22.24 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.496.
[Renumbered (a) as AS 34.03.285 and (b) as AS 34.03.115.]

Sec. 09.45.500.
Vested or contingent future rights or estate.

In cases of sales in partition, when it appears that a person has a vested or contingent future right or estate in any of the property sold, the court shall determine the proportional value of the contingent or vested right or estate according to the principles of law applicable to annuities and survivorship, and shall direct that portion of the proceeds of the sale to be invested, secured, or paid over in a manner that will protect the rights and interests of the parties.

History.

(§ 22.25 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 65 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 09.45.510.
Separate sales of farms or lots.

The terms of sales of property shall be known at the time of sale, and, if the premises consist of distinct farms or lots, they shall be sold separately unless the court directs otherwise.

History.

(§ 22.26 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.520.
Persons ineligible to purchase. [Repealed, § 5 ch 78 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 09.45.530.
Report of sale.

After the sale of property ordered to be sold, a report shall be made to the court, with a description of the different parcels of lands sold to each purchaser, the name of the purchaser, the price paid or secured, the terms and conditions of the sale, and any securities taken.

History.

(§ 22.28 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.540.
Confirmation or vacation of sale.

After the filing of the report, a party entitled to a share of the proceeds may move the court to confirm or set aside the sale or sales reported. If the sale is set aside, the court may order a new sale. If the sale is confirmed, the court shall enter an order directing conveyances to be executed and securities to be taken under the sale.

The order confirming the sale discharges the property of the estate or interest of every person mentioned in AS

09.45.310

and of tenants for life or years of the property sold, and is binding and conclusive on all those persons in the same manner as a judgment of partition. The order is conclusive evidence as to the regularity of the proceedings relating to the sale.

History.

(§ 22.29 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.550.
Investment of proceeds belonging to unknown or nonresident owner.

When there are proceeds of a sale belonging to an unknown owner or to a person outside the state who has no legal representatives inside it, or where there are proceeds arising from the sale of an estate subject to the prior estate of a tenant for life or years that are paid into the court or otherwise deposited by order of the court, the court may order the proceeds to be invested in securities bearing interest for the benefit of the persons entitled to the proceeds.

History.

(§ 22.30 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.560.
Security taken and investments made in name of court clerk.

When the security for the proceeds of sale is taken or when an investment of any proceeds is made, it shall be done, except as herein otherwise provided, in the name of the clerk of the court, who shall hold the same for the use and benefit of the parties interested, subject to the order of the court.

History.

(§ 22.31 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.570.
Security taken in names of parties when interests ascertained.

When security is taken on a sale and the parties interested in the security agree on the shares and proportions to which they are respectively entitled, or when shares and proportions have been previously adjudged by the court, the securities shall be taken in the names of and payable to the parties respectively entitled to them, and shall be delivered to the parties.

History.

(§ 22.32 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.580.
Duties of clerk in securities and investments.

The clerk in whose name a security is taken or by whom an investment is made shall receive the interest and principal as it becomes due, and apply and invest it as the court may direct. The clerk shall deposit in the clerk’s office all securities taken, and keep an account in a book provided and kept for that purpose in the clerk’s office, free for inspection by all persons, of investments and money received by the clerk from the investments, and their disposition.

History.

(§ 22.33 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.590.
Compensation for unequal partition.

When it appears that partition cannot be made equal between the parties according to their respective rights, without prejudice to the rights and interests of some of them, and a partition is ordered, the court may adjudge compensation to be made by one party to another on account of the inequality. However, the compensation may not be required to be made to others by owners unknown or by infants unless it appears that the infant has personal property sufficient for that purpose and that the infant’s interest will be promoted by giving compensation.

History.

(§ 22.34 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.600.
Payment to guardian of share of infant.

When the share of an infant is sold, the proceeds of the sale may be paid to the general guardian of the infant or the special guardian appointed for the infant in the action upon the guardian’s giving the security required by law or directed by order of the court.

History.

(§ 22.35 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.610.
Payment to guardian of share of insane or incompetent person.

The guardian who may be entitled to the custody and management of the estate of an insane person or other person adjudged incapable of conducting one’s own affairs whose interest in real property has been sold may receive in behalf of that person that person’s share of the proceeds of the real property on executing an undertaking, with sufficient sureties and approved by the judge of the court, that the guardian will faithfully discharge the trust reposed in the guardian and will render a true and just account to the person entitled or to the legal representatives of that person.

History.

(§ 22.36 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.620.
Apportionment of cost of partition.

The costs of partition, including fees or referees and other disbursements, shall be paid by the parties respectively entitled to share in the lands divided in proportion to their respective interests in the property, and may be included and specified in the judgment.
In that case they are a lien on the several shares, and the judgment may be enforced by execution against the parties separately.
When, however, a litigation arises between some of the parties only, the court may require the expenses of the litigation to be paid by any or all of the parties to the litigation.

History.

(§ 22.37 ch 101 SLA 1962)